Utah statutes.
77-2a-4.   Violation of plea in abeyance agreement -- Hearing -- Entry of judgment and imposition of sentence -- Subsequent prosecutions.

(1)  If, at any time during the term of the plea in abeyance agreement, information comes to the attention of the prosecuting attorney or the court that the defendant has violated any condition of the agreement, the court, at the request of the prosecuting attorney, made by appropriate motion and affidavit, or upon its own motion, may issue an order requiring the defendant to appear before the court at a designated time and place to show cause why the court should not find the terms of the agreement to have been violated and why the agreement should not be terminated.  If, following an evidentiary hearing, the court finds that the defendant has failed to substantially comply with any term or condition of the plea in abeyance agreement, it may terminate the agreement and enter judgment of conviction and impose sentence against the defendant for the offense to which the original plea was entered. Upon entry of judgment of conviction and imposition of sentence, any amounts paid by the defendant as a plea in abeyance fee prior to termination of the agreement shall be credited against any fine imposed by the court.

(2)  The termination of a plea in abeyance agreement and subsequent entry of judgment of conviction and imposition of sentence shall not bar any independent prosecution arising from any offense that constituted a violation of any term or condition of an agreement whereby the original plea was placed in abeyance.



Enacted by Chapter 82, 1993 General Session

